Massachusetts, session 194th, H948.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
There shall be a one-year moratorium on the extraction of minerals, sand and gravel from
land for the purposes of commercial sale in Plymouth and Bristol Counties. This includes
extraction and commercial sale on land zoned for agricultural purposes.
of 1